Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 18 Public Records
25-18-306. Selective and partial depositories.

In addition to the Mullins Library of the University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, which was designated as a depository of all state, city, and county documents under the provisions of § 25-18-301, the library of each of the state-supported institutions of higher learning in this state is designated as a selective or partial depository of state, city, and county documents.

Each department or division of the state, city, and county which is directed to furnish copies of publications to the Mullins Library is authorized and directed to send to the Arkansas State Library a list of all publications published by the department or division during the preceding quarter.

The Arkansas State Library shall prepare a checklist of all publications published by all counties, cities, departments, and agencies of this state and shall furnish quarterly a copy of the checklist to each of the institutions of higher learning in this state.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 163, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-440.

25-18-307. Procedure to obtain state and local publications.

Any institution of higher learning desiring to obtain copies of any publication contained in the checklist shall order the number of copies, not to exceed three (3) copies of any one (1) report or publication, desired from the Arkansas State Library.

The Arkansas State Library shall collect the orders and shall periodically obtain from state agencies and departments, and from the various cities and counties, a sufficient number of copies and documents and publications to fill the orders.

The Arkansas State Library shall furnish all institutions of higher learning copies of any documents and publications so ordered without charge or cost.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 163, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-441.

25-18-308. State and local publications furnished to Arkansas State Library.

Each department or division of the state, a city, or a county under whose jurisdiction any printed or processed book, pamphlet, report, or other publication is issued at the expense of a municipal corporation or of a county, or of a county and a city, or of the state is directed to furnish without charge to the Arkansas State Library the number of copies of such publications as the library may order.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 163, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-442.

Cross References. Annual and biennial reports, §21-7-402.

Subchapter 4

— Settlement Agreements

Effective Dates. Acts 1991, No. 781, § 7: Mar. 26, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is the public policy of this State that public business be performed in an open and public manner so that electors are advised of the performance of public officials and of the decisions reached in public activity. Unless specifically authorized by law, no public official or employee is empowered to promise confidentiality regarding agreements that are in the public domain. To ensure that this public policy is fully carried out, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-18-401. Disclosure required.

No public official or employee acting in behalf of a governmental agency or another agency wholly or partially supported by or expending public funds shall:

Agree or authorize another to agree that all or part of a litigation settlement agreement to which the agency is a party shall be kept secret, sealed, or otherwise withheld from public disclosure; or

Seek a court order denying public access to any court record or other document containing the terms of a settlement agreement resolving a claim by or against the agency.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 781, § 1; 1997, No. 873, § 2.

25-18-402. Exemptions.

This subchapter does not prohibit the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration and his or her authorized agents from entering into agreements with taxpayers pursuant to §26-18-705 which shall not be subject to public disclosure if the subject matter of the agreement is protected from public disclosure by the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., or §26-18-303, or other state law.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 781, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 3584.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

25-18-403. Penalty.

Any person who violates the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a violation and punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1991, No. 781, § 3; 2005, No. 1994, § 159.

Subchapter 5

— Contracts

A.C.R.C. Notes. References to “this chapter” in subchapter 1 may not apply to this subchapter which was enacted subsequently.

25-18-501. State agency contracts.

When any state agency enters into a contract with any entity, the contract shall be deemed a public record in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1083, § 1.

Subchapter 6

— Retention of Public Records by State Agencies

Effective Dates. Acts 2005, No. 918, § 3: Mar. 18, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is no general records retention law and that this act is immediately necessary to preserve public records that could be lost permanently without this act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 751, § 38: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act dissolves and transfers the duties of the Executive Chief Information Officer, Chief Information Officer, and Office of Information Technology; and that dissolving the offices at the beginning of the state's fiscal year will result in a more efficient transfer of responsibilities and funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

25-18-601. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly finds that while the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., provides disclosure guarantees for public records, due to Acts 2001, No. 1252, there is no general requirement for agencies to preserve public records.

Therefore, the State of Arkansas is in need of a general records retention law to preserve records that are commonly found in most state agencies for disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., for historical purposes and for the efficient operation of state government.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1252, referred to in this section, repealed §13-4-101 et seq. which concerned public records management and archives.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Arkansas's Public Records Retention Program: Finding the FOIA'S Absent Partner, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 175.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 918, § 1.

25-18-602. Applicability.

This subchapter shall not apply to city, county, or local governmental entities.

This subchapter shall apply only to records created by each state agency after the date the state agency complies with the rules and guidelines promulgated under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 918, § 1.

25-18-603. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Public records” means the same as defined in § 25-19-103(5)(A); and

“State agencies” means all state departments, boards, and commissions.

“State agencies” does not include:

The elected constitutional officers and their staffs;

The General Assembly and its committees and staffs;

The Supreme Court;

The Court of Appeals;

The Administrative Office of the Courts; and

Public institutions of higher education with respect to academic, research, health care, and existing information and technology applications and underlying support.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 918, § 1; 2007, No. 751, § 20.

25-18-604. Retention requirement.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall direct the development of rules and guidelines for the retention of public records commonly found in most state agencies.

The department shall promulgate pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., rules and guidelines governing the retention and management of public records commonly found in most state agencies, including, but not limited to, electronic records.

The Arkansas General Records Retention Schedule, previously promulgated and adopted as Agency Policy 200.000 of the Office of Information Technology, shall be an official rule of the department subject to revision under subsection (d) of this section.

Each state agency shall comply with the rules and guidelines promulgated under this subchapter by July 1, 2007.

The department shall make periodic updates to the rules governing the retention and management of public records commonly found in most state agencies pursuant to the provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 918, § 1; 2007, No. 751, § 21; 2019, No. 315, § 2928.

25-18-605. Conflict with federal or state laws.

If any rule promulgated under this subchapter is found to conflict with current federal or state law for the retention of public records, the federal or state law shall override the rule promulgated under this subchapter.

Rules promulgated under this subchapter shall not require the disclosure of public records otherwise exempt from disclosure by federal or state law.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 918, § 1.

Subchapter 7

— Electronic Records and Signatures

25-18-701. Use of electronic records.

All state agencies shall use or permit the use of electronic records and electronic signatures.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 722, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 722, § 2, provided:

“(a)Arkansas Code §25-18-701 shall be implemented no later than June 30, 2009.

“(b)The initial standards and policies governing the use, management, retention, privacy, and security of electronic signatures and electronic records of state agencies required in Arkansas Code §25-18-702 shall be established by the Executive Chief Information Officer no later than June 30, 2008.”

25-18-702. Standards and policies.

The Director of the Division of Information Systems shall establish standards and polices governing the use, management, retention, privacy, and security of electronic records of state agencies.

The standards and policies shall address:

The manner and format in which the electronic records must be created, generated, sent, communicated, received, and stored and the systems established for those purposes;

Differing levels of criteria from which state agencies may choose in implementing the most appropriate standard for a particular application;

The use of electronic signatures, including without limitation the type of electronic signature required, the manner and format in which the electronic signature must be affixed to the electronic record, the identification of the author of an electronic record, and the verification or authentication of the signature of the author of an electronic record;

Control processes and procedures as appropriate to ensure adequate preservation, disposition, integrity, security, confidentiality, and auditability of electronic records; and

Any other required attributes for electronic records that are reasonably necessary under the circumstances.

The director shall make a monthly report to the Joint Committee on Advanced Communications and Information Technology regarding the status of the development of the standards and policies described in this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 722, § 2, provided:

“(a)Arkansas Code §25-18-701 shall be implemented no later than June 30, 2009.

“(b)The initial standards and policies governing the use, management, retention, privacy, and security of electronic signatures and electronic records of state agencies required in Arkansas Code §25-18-702 shall be established by the Executive Chief Information Officer no later than June 30, 2008.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted the (1) designator in (a); and substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Services” in (a) and (c).

ALR.

Disclosure of Electronic Data under State Public Records and Freedom of Information Acts. 54 A.L.R.6th 653.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 722, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6305, 6306.

25-18-703. State agency standards and policies.

A state agency may use the standards and policies developed by the Director of the Division of Information Systems under §25-18-702, or it may develop its own standards and policies consistent with the requirements established in §25-18-702(b).

History.

Acts 2007, No. 722, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6307.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems”.

25-17-207. Oath of members.

Subchapter 3

— Regulation of Property

25-18-214. Clerks — Personal liability.

25-18-218. Supreme Court and Court of Appeals reports — Medium of publication — Distribution.

25-18-220, 25-18-221. [Repealed.]

25-18-303. Acts 1947, No. 170, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-430.

25-18-305. Federal publications.